New York, session 2025-2026, A6793.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general aviation task force is hereby established to 2 conduct a study on measures that may improve general aviation in the 3 state of New York. For purposes of this act, "general aviation" shall 4 mean all civil aviation operations other than scheduled passenger 5 airline operations. The scope of study shall include: 6 a. how laws and regulations created by the state of New York, includ- 7 ing regulations promulgated by the department of transportation, impact 8 investment in general aviation operations within the state; 9 b. how regulatory agencies outside the state of New York, such as the 10 Federal Aviation Administration and the International Civil Aviation 11 Organization, impact investment in general aviation operations within 12 the state; 13 c. the effect of airport improvement and revitalization projects on 14 investment in general aviation operations within the state; 15 d. an analysis of the tax burden imposed on general aviation entities 16 within the state as opposed to other states and its impact on investment 17 in general aviation services; and 18 e. measures other states or countries have taken to incentivize 19 investment in general aviation services. 20 § 2. a. The task force shall consist of eleven members to be appointed 21 as follows: 22 (1) three members appointed by the governor, provided that the 23 appointees shall have experience in one or or more of the following 24 areas: air transportation or civil aviation, public administration, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02392-01-5 A. 6793 2 1 business management, finance, accounting, law, engineering, land use, 2 urban and regional planning, management of large capital projects, or 3 labor relations; 4 (2) two members appointed by the temporary president of the senate; 5 (3) two members appointed by the speaker of the assembly; 6 (4) two members appointed by the commissioner of the department of 7 transportation; 8 (5) one member appointed by the minority leader of the senate; and 9 (6) one member appointed by the minority leader of the assembly. 10 b. A majority of the total appointees of the task force shall select 11 the chair from among the appointees to the task force then in office. 12 c. The members of the task force shall receive no compensation for 13 their services, but shall be allowed their actual and necessary expenses 14 incurred in the performance of their duties pursuant to this act. 15 d. All appointments shall be made no later than thirty days after the 16 effective date of this act. All vacancies shall be filled by the 17 appointing authority. 18 e. The task force may request and shall receive from any department, 19 division, board, bureau, commission or other agency of the state or any 20 state public authority such assistance, information and data as will 21 enable the task force to properly carry out its powers and duties. 22 f. The task force shall be authorized to hold public hearings and 23 meetings, and to consult with any organization, educational institution, 24 or other government entity or person, to enable it to accomplish its 25 duties. 26 § 3. The task force shall report its findings, conclusions, and recom- 27 mendations to the governor, temporary president of the senate, and 28 speaker of the assembly and such report shall be posted on the depart- 29 ment of transportation's public-facing website within one hundred eighty 30 days after the effective date of this act. 31 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.